Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2222
Act, how cited.

Sections 39-2201 to 39-2226 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Highway Bond Act.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 22, p. 1113;

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 15;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 40.